src/morphology/incoming/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Propernouns

Miðgarð+noun+prop:Miðgarð # "" ;
Valhǫll+noun+prop:Valhǫll # "" ;
Arinbjǫrn+noun+prop:Arinbjǫrn  # "" ;
Auðun+noun+prop:Auðun  # "" ;
Aðalból+noun+prop:Aðalból  # "" ;
Aðalbóli+noun+prop:Aðalbóli  # "" ;
Bǫðvarr+noun+prop+nom:Bǫðvarr  # "" ;
Bjarna+noun+prop:Bjarna  # "" ;
Bjarni+noun+prop:Bjarni  # "" ;
Danmark+noun+prop:Danmark  # "" ;
Egil+noun+prop:Egil  # "" ;
Egill+noun+prop:Egill  # "" ;
Egils+noun+prop+gen:Egils  # "" ;
Eirík+noun+prop:Eirík  # "" ;
Eiríki+noun+prop:Eiríki  # "" ;
Eiríkr+noun+prop+nom:Eiríkr  # "" ;
Eiríks+noun+prop+gen:Eiríks  # "" ;
Eyvindr+noun+prop+nom:Eyvindr  # "" ;
Flosi+noun+prop:Flosi  # "" ;
Freyfaxa+noun+prop:Freyfaxa  # "" ;
Freyja+noun+prop+nom:Freyja  # "" ;
Freyju+noun+prop+acc:Freyju  # "" ;
Freyju+noun+prop+gen:Freyju  # "" ;
Freyju+noun+prop+dat:Freyju  # "" ;
Freyr+noun+prop+nom:Freyr  # "" ;
Freys+noun+prop+gen:Freys  # "" ;
Gizurr+noun+prop+nom:Gizurr  # "" ;
Glámr+noun+prop+nom:Glámr  # "" ;
Grœnland+noun+prop:Grœnland  # "" ;
Grœnlandi+noun+prop:Grœnlandi  # "" ;
Grœnlands+noun+prop+gen:Grœnlands  # "" ;
Grettir+noun+prop+nom:Grettir  # "" ;
Grímr+noun+prop+nom:Grímr  # "" ;
Gunnar+noun+prop:Gunnar  # "" ;
Gunnarr+noun+prop+nom:Gunnarr  # "" ;
Gunnarsson+noun+prop:Gunnarsson  # "" ;
Gutland+noun+prop:Gutland  # "" ;
Gutlandi+noun+prop:Gutlandi  # "" ;
Hǫttr+noun+prop+nom:Hǫttr  # "" ;
Han+noun+prop:Han  # "" ;
Haraldr+noun+prop+nom:Haraldr  # "" ;
Helgi+noun+prop:Helgi  # "" ;
Hjálmars+noun+prop+gen:Hjálmars  # "" ;
Hrafnkell+noun+prop:Hrafnkell  # "" ;
Hrafnkeli+noun+prop:Hrafnkeli  # "" ;
Hrafnkels+noun+prop+gen:Hrafnkels  # "" ;
Hrafnkelsdal+noun+prop:Hrafnkelsdal  # "" ;
Hrólfr+noun+prop+nom:Hrólfr  # "" ;
Hrólfs+noun+prop+gen:Hrólfs  # "" ;
Karlsefni+noun+prop:Karlsefni  # "" ;
Kristni+noun+prop:Kristni  # "" ;
Kristnir+noun+prop+nom:Kristnir  # "" ;
Krists+noun+prop+gen:Krists  # "" ;
Leif+noun+prop:Leif  # "" ;
Leifr+noun+prop+nom:Leifr  # "" ;
Loki+noun+prop+nom:Loki  # "" ;
Markland+noun+prop:Markland  # "" ;
Njáll+noun+prop+nom:Njáll  # "" ;
Norvegi+noun+prop:Norvegi  # "" ;
Nóregi+noun+prop:Nóregi  # "" ;
Nóregs+noun+prop+gen:Nóregs  # "" ;
Saxland+noun+prop:Saxland  # "" ;
Sigmund+noun+prop:Sigmund  # "" ;
Sigmundar+noun+prop:Sigmundar  # "" ;
Sigmundi+noun+prop:Sigmundi  # "" ;
Sigmundr+noun+prop+nom:Sigmundr  # "" ;
Signý+noun+prop:Signý  # "" ;
Sigurðr+noun+prop+nom:Sigurðr  # "" ;
Sigvaldi+noun+prop:Sigvaldi  # "" ;
Sinfjǫtli+noun+prop:Sinfjǫtli  # "" ;
Skarpheðinn+noun+prop:Skarpheðinn  # "" ;
Skaði+noun+prop:Skaði  # "" ;
Skrýmir+noun+prop+nom:Skrýmir  # "" ;
Skírnir+noun+prop+nom:Skírnir  # "" ;
Snorri+noun+prop+nom:Snorri  # "" ;
Sveinn+noun+prop+nom:Sveinn  # "" ;
Thā+noun+prop:Thā  # "" ;
Upsala+noun+prop:Upsala  # "" ;
Vínland+noun+prop:Vínland  # "" ;
Vínlands+noun+prop+gen:Vínlands  # "" ;
Yggdrasils+noun+prop+gen:Yggdrasils  # "" ;
Ísland+noun+prop+nom:Ísland  # "" ;
Ísland+noun+prop+acc:Ísland  # "" ;
Óláfr+noun+prop+nom:Óláfr  # "" ;
Óláfs+noun+prop+gen:Óláfs  # "" ;
Óðinn+noun+prop+nom:Óðinn  # "" ;
Óðins+noun+prop+gen:Óðins  # "" ;
Útgarða-Loka+noun+prop:Útgarða-Loka  # "" ;
Útgarða-Loki+noun+prop:Útgarða-Loki  # "" ;
Þórr+noun+prop+nom:Þórr  # "" ;
Þórgeirr+noun+prop+nom:Þórgeirr  # "" ;
Þórgeir+noun+prop+acc:Þórgeir  # "" ;
Þorkell+noun+prop:Þorkell  # "" ;
Þjálfi+noun+prop:Þjálfi  # "" ;
Útgarðr+noun+prop+nom:Útgarðr  # "" ;
Útgarð+noun+prop+acc:Útgarð  # "" ;
